Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-812
Violators; actions against; joinder of parties.

Any corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association which is charged with violating sections 59-801 to 59-831 and any president, director, treasurer, officer, limited liability company member, or agent thereof may be joined as a party in any proceeding, civil or criminal, to enforce such sections.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 11, p. 640;

R.S.1913, § 4055;

C.S.1922, § 3458;

C.S.1929, § 59-811;

R.S.1943, § 59-812;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 367;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 75;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 5.